Utah statutes.
53A-10-106.   Components of educator evaluation program.

An educator evaluation program adopted by a local school board in consultation with a committee shall include the following components:

(1)  a reliable and valid evaluation program consistent with generally accepted professional standards for personnel evaluation systems;

(2)  systematic evaluation procedures for both provisional and career educators;

(3)  the use of multiple lines of evidence, such as:

(a)  self-evaluation;

(b)  student and parent input;

(c)  peer observation;

(d)  supervisor observations;

(e)  evidence of professional growth;

(f)  student achievement data; and

(g)  other indicators of instructional improvement;

(4)  a reasonable number of observation periods for an evaluation to insure adequate reliability; and

(5)  administration of an educator's evaluation by:

(a)  the principal;

(b)  the principal's designee;

(c)  the educator's immediate supervisor; or

(d)  another person specified in the evaluation program.

